Illinois, session 104th, HB1124.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Act on the Aging is amended by 5changing Section 4.04 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 105/4.04)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6104.04)7    Sec. 4.04. Long Term Care Ombudsman Program. The purpose 8of the Long Term Care Ombudsman Program is to ensure that older 9persons and persons with disabilities receive quality 10services. This is accomplished by providing advocacy services 11for residents of long term care facilities and participants 12receiving home care and community-based care. Managed care is 13increasingly becoming the vehicle for delivering health and 14long-term services and supports to seniors and persons with 15disabilities, including dual eligible participants. The 16additional ombudsman authority will allow advocacy services to 17be provided to Illinois participants for the first time and 18will produce a cost savings for the State of Illinois by 19supporting the rebalancing efforts of the Patient Protection 20and Affordable Care Act. 21    (a) Long Term Care Ombudsman Program. The Department shall 22establish a Long Term Care Ombudsman Program, through the 23Office of State Long Term Care Ombudsman ("the Office"), in   HB1124- 2 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1accordance with the provisions of the Older Americans Act of 21965, as now or hereafter amended. The Long Term Care 3Ombudsman Program is authorized, subject to sufficient 4appropriations, to advocate on behalf of older persons and 5persons with disabilities residing in their own homes or 6community-based settings, relating to matters which may 7adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of 8such individuals. 9    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section, unless the 10context requires otherwise:11        (1) "Access" means the right to:12            (i) Enter any long term care facility or assisted 13        living or shared housing establishment or supportive 14        living facility;15            (ii) Communicate privately and without restriction 16        with any resident, regardless of age, who consents to 17        the communication;18            (iii) Seek consent to communicate privately and 19        without restriction with any participant or resident, 20        regardless of age;21            (iv) Inspect and copy the clinical and other 22        records of a participant or resident, regardless of 23        age, with the express written consent of the 24        participant or resident, or if consent is given 25        orally, visually, or through the use of auxiliary aids 26        and services, such consent is documented   HB1124- 3 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1        contemporaneously by a representative of the Office in 2        accordance with such procedures;3            (v) Observe all areas of the long term care 4        facility or supportive living facilities, assisted 5        living or shared housing establishment except the 6        living area of any resident who protests the 7        observation; and8            (vi) Subject to permission of the participant or 9        resident requesting services or his or her 10        representative, enter a home or community-based 11        setting. 12        (2) "Long Term Care Facility" means (i) any facility 13    as defined by Section 1-113 of the Nursing Home Care Act, 14    as now or hereafter amended; (ii) any skilled nursing 15    facility or a nursing facility which meets the 16    requirements of Section 1819(a), (b), (c), and (d) or 17    Section 1919(a), (b), (c), and (d) of the Social Security 18    Act, as now or hereafter amended (42 U.S.C. 1395i-3(a), 19    (b), (c), and (d) and 42 U.S.C. 1396r(a), (b), (c), and 20    (d)); (iii) any facility as defined by Section 1-113 of 21    the ID/DD Community Care Act, as now or hereafter amended; 22    (iv) any facility as defined by Section 1-113 of MC/DD 23    Act, as now or hereafter amended; and (v) any facility 24    licensed under Section 4-105 or 4-201 of the Specialized 25    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, as now or 26    hereafter amended.  HB1124- 4 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1        (2.5) "Assisted living establishment" and "shared 2    housing establishment" have the meanings given those terms 3    in Section 10 of the Assisted Living and Shared Housing 4    Act.5        (2.7) "Supportive living facility" means a facility 6    established under Section 5-5.01a of the Illinois Public 7    Aid Code.8        (2.8) "Community-based setting" means any place of 9    abode other than an individual's private home. 10        (3) "State Long Term Care Ombudsman" means any person 11    employed by the Department to fulfill the requirements of 12    the Office of State Long Term Care Ombudsman as required 13    under the Older Americans Act of 1965, as now or hereafter 14    amended, and Departmental policy.15        (3.1) "Ombudsman" means any designated representative 16    of the State Long Term Care Ombudsman Program; provided 17    that the representative, whether he is paid for or 18    volunteers his ombudsman services, shall be qualified and 19    designated by the Office to perform the duties of an 20    ombudsman as specified by the Department in rules and in 21    accordance with the provisions of the Older Americans Act 22    of 1965, as now or hereafter amended.23        (4) "Participant" means an older person aged 60 or 24    over or an adult with a disability aged 18 through 59 who 25    is eligible for services under any of the following: 26            (i) A medical assistance waiver administered by   HB1124- 5 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1        the State. 2            (ii) A managed care organization providing care 3        coordination and other services to seniors and persons 4        with disabilities. 5        (5) "Resident" means an older person aged 60 or over 6    or an adult with a disability aged 18 through 59 who 7    resides in a long-term care facility. 8    (c) Ombudsman; rules. The Office of State Long Term Care 9Ombudsman shall be composed of at least one full-time 10ombudsman and shall include a system of designated regional 11long term care ombudsman programs. Each regional program shall 12be designated by the State Long Term Care Ombudsman as a 13subdivision of the Office and any representative of a regional 14program shall be treated as a representative of the Office.15    The Department, in consultation with the Office, shall 16promulgate administrative rules in accordance with the 17provisions of the Older Americans Act of 1965, as now or 18hereafter amended, to establish the responsibilities of the 19Department and the Office of State Long Term Care Ombudsman 20and the designated regional Ombudsman programs. The 21administrative rules shall include the responsibility of the 22Office and designated regional programs to investigate and 23resolve complaints made by or on behalf of residents of long 24term care facilities, supportive living facilities, and 25assisted living and shared housing establishments, and 26participants residing in their own homes or community-based   HB1124- 6 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1settings, including the option to serve residents and 2participants under the age of 60, relating to actions, 3inaction, or decisions of providers, or their representatives, 4of such facilities and establishments, of public agencies, or 5of social services agencies, which may adversely affect the 6health, safety, welfare, or rights of such residents and 7participants. The Office and designated regional programs may 8represent all residents and participants, but are not required 9by this Act to represent persons under 60 years of age, except 10to the extent required by federal law. When necessary and 11appropriate, representatives of the Office shall refer 12complaints to the appropriate regulatory State agency. The 13Department, in consultation with the Office, shall cooperate 14with the Department of Human Services and other State agencies 15in providing information and training to designated regional 16long term care ombudsman programs about the appropriate 17assessment and treatment (including information about 18appropriate supportive services, treatment options, and 19assessment of rehabilitation potential) of the participants 20they serve.21    The State Long Term Care Ombudsman and all other 22ombudsmen, as defined in paragraph (3.1) of subsection (b) 23must submit to background checks under the Health Care Worker 24Background Check Act and receive training, as prescribed by 25the Illinois Department on Aging, before visiting facilities, 26private homes, or community-based settings. The training must   HB1124- 7 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1include information specific to assisted living 2establishments, supportive living facilities, shared housing 3establishments, private homes, and community-based settings 4and to the rights of residents and participants guaranteed 5under the corresponding Acts and administrative rules. 6    (c-5) Consumer Choice Information Reports. The Office 7shall:8        (1) In collaboration with the Attorney General, create 9    a Consumer Choice Information Report form to be completed 10    by all licensed long term care facilities to aid 11    Illinoisans and their families in making informed choices 12    about long term care. The Office shall create a Consumer 13    Choice Information Report for each type of licensed long 14    term care facility. The Office shall collaborate with the 15    Attorney General and the Department of Human Services to 16    create a Consumer Choice Information Report form for 17    facilities licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or 18    the MC/DD Act. 19        (2) Develop a database of Consumer Choice Information 20    Reports completed by licensed long term care facilities 21    that includes information in the following consumer 22    categories:23            (A) Medical Care, Services, and Treatment.24            (B) Special Services and Amenities.25            (C) Staffing.26            (D) Facility Statistics and Resident Demographics.  HB1124- 8 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1            (E) Ownership and Administration.2            (F) Safety and Security.3            (G) Meals and Nutrition.4            (H) Rooms, Furnishings, and Equipment.5            (I) Family, Volunteer, and Visitation Provisions.6        (3) Make this information accessible to the public, 7    including on the Internet by means of a hyperlink on the 8    Office's World Wide Web home page. Information about 9    facilities licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or 10    the MC/DD Act shall be made accessible to the public by the 11    Department of Human Services, including on the Internet by 12    means of a hyperlink on the Department of Human Services' 13    "For Customers" website. 14        (4) Have the authority, with the Attorney General, to 15    verify that information provided by a facility is 16    accurate.17        (5) Request a new report from any licensed facility 18    whenever it deems necessary. 19        (6) Include in the Office's Consumer Choice 20    Information Report for each type of licensed long term 21    care facility additional information on each licensed long 22    term care facility in the State of Illinois, including 23    information regarding each facility's compliance with the 24    relevant State and federal statutes, rules, and standards; 25    customer satisfaction surveys; and information generated 26    from quality measures developed by the Centers for   HB1124- 9 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1    Medicare and Medicaid Services.2    (d) Access and visitation rights.3        (1) In accordance with subparagraphs (A) and (E) of 4    paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 1819 and 5    subparagraphs (A) and (E) of paragraph (3) of subsection 6    (c) of Section 1919 of the Social Security Act, as now or 7    hereafter amended (42 U.S.C. 1395i-3 (c)(3)(A) and (E) and 8    42 U.S.C. 1396r (c)(3)(A) and (E)), and Section 712 of the 9    Older Americans Act of 1965, as now or hereafter amended 10    (42 U.S.C. 3058f), a long term care facility, supportive 11    living facility, assisted living establishment, and shared 12    housing establishment must:13            (i) permit immediate access to any resident, 14        regardless of age, by a designated ombudsman;15            (ii) permit representatives of the Office, with 16        the permission of the resident, the resident's legal 17        representative, or the resident's legal guardian, to 18        examine and copy a resident's clinical and other 19        records, including facility reports of incidents or 20        occurrences made to State agencies, regardless of the 21        age of the resident, and if a resident is unable to 22        consent to such review, and has no legal guardian, 23        permit representatives of the Office appropriate 24        access, as defined by the Department, in consultation 25        with the Office, in administrative rules, to the 26        resident's records; and  HB1124- 10 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1            (iii) permit a representative of the Program to 2        communicate privately and without restriction with any 3        participant who consents to the communication 4        regardless of the consent of, or withholding of 5        consent by, a legal guardian or an agent named in a 6        power of attorney executed by the participant.7        (2) Each long term care facility, supportive living 8    facility, assisted living establishment, and shared 9    housing establishment, and State-operated developmental 10    center shall display, in multiple, conspicuous public 11    places within the facility accessible to both visitors and 12    residents and in an easily readable format, the address 13    and statewide toll-free telephone number of the Long Term 14    Care Ombudsman Program and the Internet web address of the 15    Long Term Care Ombudsman Program's website phone number of 16    the Office of the Long Term Care Ombudsman, in a manner 17    prescribed by the Office.18        (3) Each long term care facility, supportive living 19    facility, assisted living establishment, shared housing 20    establishment, and State-operated developmental center 21    shall post on the home page of the facility's website the 22    statewide toll-free telephone number of the Long Term Care 23    Ombudsman Program and a link to the Long Term Care 24    Ombudsman Program's website. A facility:25            (i) may comply with this paragraph by posting the 26        required information on the website of the facility's   HB1124- 11 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1        parent company if the facility does not maintain a 2        unique website; 3            (ii) is not required to comply with this paragraph 4        if the establishment and any parent company do not 5        maintain a website; and6            (iii) is not required to comply with this 7        paragraph in instances where the parent company 8        operates in multiple states and the facility does not 9        maintain a unique website. 10    (e) Immunity. An ombudsman or any representative of the 11Office participating in the good faith performance of his or 12her official duties shall have immunity from any liability 13(civil, criminal or otherwise) in any proceedings (civil, 14criminal or otherwise) brought as a consequence of the 15performance of his official duties.16    (f) Business offenses.17        (1) No person shall:18            (i) Intentionally prevent, interfere with, or 19        attempt to impede in any way any representative of the 20        Office in the performance of his official duties under 21        this Act and the Older Americans Act of 1965; or22            (ii) Intentionally retaliate, discriminate 23        against, or effect reprisals against any long term 24        care facility resident or employee for contacting or 25        providing information to any representative of the 26        Office.  HB1124- 12 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1        (2) A violation of this Section is a business offense, 2    punishable by a fine not to exceed $501.3        (3) The State Long Term Care Ombudsman shall notify 4    the State's Attorney of the county in which the long term 5    care facility, supportive living facility, or assisted 6    living or shared housing establishment is located, or the 7    Attorney General, of any violations of this Section.8    (g) Confidentiality of records and identities. All records 9containing resident, participant, and complainant information 10collected by the Long Term Care Ombudsman Program are 11confidential and shall not be disclosed outside of the program 12without a lawful subpoena or the permission of the State 13Ombudsman. The State Ombudsman, at his or her discretion, may 14disclose resident or participant information if it is in the 15best interest of the resident or participant. The Department 16shall establish procedures for the disclosure of program 17records by the State Ombudsman. The procedures shall prohibit 18the disclosure of the identity of any complainant, resident, 19participant, witness, or employee of a long term care provider 20in case records unless:21        (1) the complainant, resident, participant, witness, 22    or employee of a long term care provider or his or her 23    legal representative consents to the disclosure and the 24    consent is in writing;25        (2) the complainant, resident, participant, witness, 26    or employee of a long term care provider or the resident or   HB1124- 13 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1    participant's legal representative gives consent orally; 2    and the consent is documented contemporaneously in writing 3    in accordance with such requirements as the Department 4    shall establish; or5        (3) the disclosure is required by court order.6    (h) Legal representation. The Attorney General shall 7provide legal representation to any representative of the 8Office against whom suit or other legal action is brought in 9connection with the performance of the representative's 10official duties, in accordance with the State Employee 11Indemnification Act.12    (i) Treatment by prayer and spiritual means. Nothing in 13this Act shall be construed to authorize or require the 14medical supervision, regulation or control of remedial care or 15treatment of any resident in a long term care facility 16operated exclusively by and for members or adherents of any 17church or religious denomination the tenets and practices of 18which include reliance solely upon spiritual means through 19prayer for healing.20    (j) The Long Term Care Ombudsman Fund is created as a 21special fund in the State treasury to receive moneys for the 22express purposes of this Section. All interest earned on 23moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys 24contained in the fund shall be used to support the purposes of 25this Section. 26    (k) Each Regional Ombudsman may, in accordance with rules   HB1124- 14 -LRB104 03768 KTG 13792 b1promulgated by the Office, establish a multi-disciplinary team 2to act in an advisory role for the purpose of providing 3professional knowledge and expertise in handling complex 4abuse, neglect, and advocacy issues involving participants. 5Each multi-disciplinary team may consist of one or more 6volunteer representatives from any combination of at least 7 7members from the following professions: banking or finance; 8disability care; health care; pharmacology; law; law 9enforcement; emergency responder; mental health care; clergy; 10coroner or medical examiner; substance abuse; domestic 11violence; sexual assault; or other related fields. To support 12multi-disciplinary teams in this role, law enforcement 13agencies and coroners or medical examiners shall supply 14records as may be requested in particular cases. The Regional 15Ombudsman, or his or her designee, of the area in which the 16multi-disciplinary team is created shall be the facilitator of 17the multi-disciplinary team. 18(Source: P.A. 102-1033, eff. 1-1-23; 103-329, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-762, eff. 1-1-25; 103-767, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)